District of Columbia statutes.
1-201.01

Short title.

This chapter may be cited as the “District of Columbia Home Rule Act”.

Dec. 24, 1973, 87 Stat. 777, Pub. L. 93-198, title I, § 101
Aug. 5, 1997, 111 Stat. 251, Pub. L. 105-33, title XI, § 11717(a)

History

This section is referenced in § 1-301.89b, § 1-603.01, § 1-1001.02, § 1-1161.01, § 2-1217.33a, § 2-1217.34a, § 2-1217.71, § 2-1217.102, § 2-1217.131, § 8-1778.01, § 9-107.51, § 34-1311.01, § 34-2202.03, § 47-334, § 47-340.01, and § 47-2752.

Section References